Massachusetts, session 194th, S1017.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding in line 2 after all instances of the word “children” the following
words:- “who are residents of the Commonwealth”.
of 1